Utah statutes.
53A-10-103.   Establishment of educator evaluation program -- Joint committee.

(1)  Each local school board shall develop an evaluation program in consultation with its educators through appointment of a joint committee.

(2)  The joint committee shall consist of an equal number of classroom teachers, parents, and administrators appointed by the local school board.

(3)  A local school board may appoint members of the joint committee from a list of nominees:

(a)  voted on by classroom teachers in a nomination election;

(b)  voted on by the administrators in a nomination election; and

(c)  of parents submitted by school community councils within the district.

(4)  The evaluation program developed by the joint committee must comply with the requirements of this chapter.

